Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.52.025

Residential burglary.

(1) A person is guilty of residential burglary if, with intent to commit a crime against a person or property therein, the person enters or remains unlawfully in a dwelling other than a vehicle.

(2) Residential burglary is a class B felony. In establishing sentencing guidelines and disposition standards, residential burglary is to be considered a more serious offense than second degree burglary.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 38; 1989 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 1; 1989 c 412 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Effective date—1989 2nd ex.s. c 1: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1990." [ 1989 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 4; 1989 c 412 s 4.]